Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB544.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 TLSB 5103YC (8) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known as the âTax 1 the Endowments Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. Section 256.189, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 3 by adding the following new paragraph: 4 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. (1) Approve and award supplemental 5 tuition grants after January 1, 2028. 6 (2) The commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 7 to administer the approval and awarding of supplemental tuition 8 grants. 9 Sec. 3. Section 256.189, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 3. a. An Iowa tuition grants fund is established in 12 the state treasury. The fund shall be administered by 13 the commission and shall consist of moneys appropriated 14 by the general assembly and other moneys received by the 15 commission for deposit in the fund. The moneys in the fund 16 are appropriated to the commission for purposes of providing 17 tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in 18 accredited private institutions. Notwithstanding section 19 8.33 , moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year 20 shall not revert to the general fund of the state but shall 21 remain available for expenditure for purposes of providing 22 tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in 23 accredited private institutions for subsequent fiscal years. 24 Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or 25 earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the 26 fund and are appropriated to the commission for purposes of 27 administering any scholarship or grant program described in 28 this subchapter VII, part 4 . 29 b. After January 1, 2028, a high-wage and high-demand jobs 30 account shall be created within the fund. Moneys credited to 31 the account from the tax, interest, and penalties collected 32 under section 422B.1, subsection 3, paragraph âbâ , shall be used 33 to supplement tuition grants to qualified students enrolled in 34 accredited private institutions in majors that correspond with 35 -1- LSB 5103YC (8) 91 jm/jh 1/ 5 H.F. _____ high-wage and high-demand jobs identified pursuant to section 1 84A.1B, subsection 5. 2 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 262.29 Endowment ââ fees. 3 1. As used in this section: 4 a. âEndowmentâ means the same as defined in section 422B.1. 5 b. âEndowment valueâ means the same as defined in section 6 422B.1. 7 c. âInstitutionâ means an institution of higher education 8 governed by the board. 9 2. An institution shall not charge or pay another entity 10 more than five percent of the gross proceeds of any gift made 11 to the institution. 12 3. An institution shall not charge an annual fee in excess 13 of one percent of the endowment value for the management and 14 administration of the endowment of the institution. 15 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 422B.1 Endowment tax. 16 1. For purposes of this chapter: 17 a. âDepartmentâ means the department of revenue. 18 b. âEducational institutionâ means any institution of 19 higher education governed by the state board of regents or an 20 accredited private institution as defined in section 256.183, 21 with an endowment value in excess of two hundred fifty million 22 dollars. 23 c. âEndowmentâ means the corpus of funds or other assets 24 held and administered by an educational institution or a 25 related organization to the educational institution, the 26 principal of which is intended to be preserved and invested for 27 the purpose of generating income to support the educational 28 institutionâs operations, scholarships, research, or other 29 institutional purposes, whether unrestricted, temporarily 30 restricted, or permanently restricted. 31 d. âEndowment valueâ means the total aggregate fair market 32 value of all assets constituting the endowment at the close of 33 the preceding tax year. 34 e. âRelated organizationâ means any organization which 35 -2- LSB 5103YC (8) 91 jm/jh 2/ 5 H.F. _____ controls or is controlled by the educational institution, is 1 controlled by one or more persons which also controls the 2 educational institution, or is a supported organization as 3 defined in section 509(f)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or 4 an organization described in section 509(a)(3) of the Internal 5 Revenue Code. 6 2. A tax shall be imposed annually upon an educational 7 institutionâs endowment value in excess of two hundred fifty 8 million dollars at a rate of fifteen percent for tax years 9 beginning on or after January 1, 2027. 10 3. a. Taxes, interest, and penalties collected under this 11 chapter from educational institutions governed by the state 12 board of regents shall be deposited in the Iowa workforce grant 13 incentive fund established in section 256.230. 14 b. Taxes, interest, and penalties collected from educational 15 institutions that are accredited private institutions shall 16 be deposited into the high-wage and high-demand account 17 established in section 256.189, subsection 3, paragraph âbâ . 18 4. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 19 to administer this chapter. 20